Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.

§ 77-3-1.
Application of article to municipal public utilities.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 77-3-6, any public utility as defined in paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3, owned or operated by a municipality shall not be subject to the provisions of this article, except as to extension of utilities greater than one (1) mile outside corporate boundaries after March 29, 1956.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch 502, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 77-3-2.
Declaration of policy.

The Legislature finds and determines that the rates, services and operations of public utilities as defined in this title are affected with the public interest and that the availability of an adequate and reliable service by such public utilities to the people, economy and government of the State of Mississippi is a matter of public policy. The Legislature hereby declares to be the policy of the State of Mississippi:

To provide fair regulation of public utilities in the interest of the public;

To promote the inherent advantage of regulated public utilities;

To promote adequate, reliable and economical service to all citizens and residents of the state;

To provide just and reasonable rates and charges for public utility services without unjust discrimination, undue preferences or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices and consistent with long-term management and conservation of energy resources by avoiding wasteful, uneconomic and inefficient uses of energy;

To encourage and promote harmony between public utilities, their users and the environment;

To foster the continued service of public utilities on a well-planned and coordinated basis that is consistent with the level of service needed for the protection of public health and safety and for the promotion of the general welfare;

To cooperate with other states and the federal government in promoting and coordinating interstate and intrastate public utility service and reliability;

To encourage the continued study and research for new and innovative rate-making procedures which will protect the state, the public, the ratepayers and the utilities, and where possible reduce the costs of the rate-making process; and

With respect to rate-regulated public utilities, to foster, encourage, enable and facilitate economic development in the State of Mississippi, and to support and augment economic development activities, and to authorize and empower the Public Service Commission, in carrying out its statutory responsibilities, to take every opportunity to advance the economic development of the state.

To these ends, therefore, authority shall be vested in the Mississippi Public Service Commission to regulate public utilities in accordance with the provisions of this title.

The commission shall, in addition to its other powers and duties, be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to consider and adopt a formula type rate of return evaluation rate which may include provision for the commission to:

Periodically review and adjust, if required, the utility’s level of revenues based upon the actual books and records of the utility which are periodically the subject of independent audits and regulatory audits;

Review the utility’s performance in certain areas or categories which may be used by the commission in the manner selected by it which may include rate incentives or penalties so long as such are found to be fair and reasonable and result in a level of revenue which is fair and reasonable; and

Use such other provisions which may be permitted by this chapter.

When a formula type rate of return evaluation rate with periodic revenue adjustments is adopted by the commission, each periodic revenue adjustment will be separately considered for the purpose of determining whether a hearing is required pursuant to Section 77-3-39(1), and no such hearing shall be required if the amount of any separate periodic adjustment to the level of revenues of the utility is not a “major change” as defined in Section 77-3-37(8).

In administering any such formula type rate of return evaluation rate, the following procedures shall be observed by the commission:

Each periodic evaluation shall be supported with a sworn filing by the utility incorporating the data specified in the formula rate adopted by the commission, and such data shall be verified by the commission; and

A hearing shall be required, as provided by law, to determine compliance with the formula rate plan and the accuracy of the data prior to any change in the level of revenues if the cumulative change in any calendar year exceeds the greater of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or four percent (4%) of the annual revenues of the utility.

The requirements of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection and other applicable provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are observed by the commission in administering such rate, are hereby declared to be procedural but are not required to be included in the rate itself.

It is the intention of the Legislature to validate, retroactively to its initial adoption by the commission, any formula type rate, including any revenue adjustments effected pursuant thereto, which has heretofore been adopted by the commission. For the purposes of the retroactive validation and the administration of any formula type rate heretofore adopted by the commission, should the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, conflict with any provisions of such formula type rate, Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be interpreted to prevail and the formula type rate shall hereafter be administered or revised to conform to Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972; provided, however, such conflict, if any, shall not be held to invalidate the retroactive effect of this section upon such rate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 48, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 360, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 77-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

The term “corporation” includes a private or public corporation, a municipality, an association, a joint-stock association or a business trust.

The term “person” includes a natural person, a partnership of two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, a cooperative, nonprofit, limited dividend or mutual association, a corporation, or any other legal entity.

The term “municipality” includes any incorporated city, town or village.

The term “public utility” includes persons and corporations, or their lessees, trustees and receivers now or hereafter owning or operating in this state equipment or facilities for:

The generation, manufacture, transmission or distribution of electricity to or for the public for compensation;

The transmission, sale, sale for resale, or distribution of natural, artificial, or mixed natural and artificial gas to the public for compensation by means of transportation, transmission, or distribution facilities and equipment located within this state; however, the term shall not include the production and gathering of natural gas, the sale of natural gas in or within the vicinity of the field where produced, or the distribution or sale of liquefied petroleum gas or the sale to the ultimate consumer of natural gas for use as a motor vehicle fuel;

The transmission, conveyance or reception of any message over wire, of writing, signs, signals, pictures and sounds of all kinds by or for the public, where such service is offered to the public for compensation, and the furnishing, or the furnishing and maintenance, of equipment or facilities to the public, for compensation, for use as a private communications system or part thereof; however, no person or corporation not otherwise a public utility within the meaning of this chapter shall be deemed such solely because of engaging in this state in the furnishing, for private use as last aforementioned, and moreover, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to television stations, radio stations, community television antenna services, video services, voice over Internet protocol services (“VoIP”), any wireless services including commercial mobile services, Internet protocol (“IP”) - enabled services or broadband services; and

The transmission, distribution, sale or resale of water to the public for compensation, or the collection, transmission, treatment or disposal of sewage, or otherwise operating a sewage disposal service, to or for the public for compensation.

The term “public utility” shall not include any person not otherwise a public utility, who furnishes the services or commodity described in this paragraph only to himself, his employees or tenants as an incident of such employee service or tenancy, if such services are not sold or resold to such tenants or employees on a metered or consumption basis other than the submetering authorized under Section 77-3-97.

A public utility’s business other than of the character defined in subparagraphs (i) through (iv) of this paragraph is not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The term “rate” means and includes every compensation, charge, fare, toll, customer deposit, rental and classification, or the formula or method by which such may be determined, or any of them, demanded, observed, charged or collected by any public utility for any service, product or commodity described in this section, offered by it to the public, and any rules, regulations, practices or contracts relating to any such compensation, charge, fare, toll, rental or classification; however, the term “rate” shall not include charges for electrical current furnished, delivered or sold by one public utility to another for resale.

The word “commission” shall refer to the Public Service Commission of the State of Mississippi, as now existing, unless otherwise indicated.

The term “affiliated interest” or “affiliate” includes:

Any person or corporation owning or holding, directly or indirectly, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting securities of a public utility;

Any person or corporation in any chain of successive ownership of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting securities of a public utility;

Any corporation of which fifteen percent (15%) or more of the voting securities is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by a public utility;

Any corporation twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting securities of which is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by any person or corporation that owns or controls, directly or indirectly, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting securities of any public utility or by any person or corporation in any chain of successive ownership of twenty-five percent (25%) of such securities;

Any person who is an officer or director of a public utility or of any corporation in any chain of successive ownership of fifteen percent (15%) or more of voting securities of a public utility; or

Any person or corporation that the commission, after notice and hearing, determines actually exercises any substantial influence or control over the policies and actions of a public utility, or over which a public utility exercises such control, or that is under a common control with a public utility, such control being the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the discretion of the management and policies of another, whether such power is established through ownership of voting securities or by any other direct or indirect means.

However, the term “affiliated interest” or “affiliate” shall not include a joint agency organized pursuant to Section 77-5-701 et seq. nor a member municipality thereof.

The term “facilities” includes all the plant and equipment of a public utility, used or useful in furnishing public utility service, including all real and personal property without limitation, and any and all means and instrumentalities in any manner owned, operated, leased, licensed, used, controlled, furnished or supplied for, by or in connection with its public utility business.

The term “cost of service” includes operating expenses, taxes, depreciation, net revenue and operating revenue requirement at a claimed rate of return from public utility operations.

The term “lead-lag study” includes an analysis to determine the amount of capital which investors in a public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, must provide to meet the day-to-day operating costs of the public utility prior to the time such costs are recovered from customers, and the measurement of (i) the lag in collecting from the customer the cost of providing service, and (ii) the lag in paying the cost of providing service by the public utility.

The term “broadband services” means any service that consists of or includes a high-speed access capability to transmit at a rate that is not less than two hundred (200) kilobits per second either in the upstream or downstream direction and either:

Is used to provide access to the Internet, or

Provides computer processing, information storage, information content or protocol conversion, including any service applications or information service provided over such high-speed access service.

The term “video services” means video programming services without regard to delivery technology, including Internet protocol technology (“Internet Protocol television or IPTV”) and video programming provided as a part of a service that enables users to access content, information, email or other services offered over the public Internet. The term “video programming” means any programming as defined in 47 USCS Section 522(20).

The term “Voice over Internet Protocol services” or “VoIP services” means any service that: (i) enables real-time, two-way voice communications that originate from or terminate to the user’s location in Internet protocol or any successor protocol; (ii) uses a broadband connection from the user’s location; and (iii) permits users generally to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

The term “commercial mobile services” means any services as defined in 47 USCS Section 332(d).

The term “Internet protocol-enabled services” or “IP-enabled services” means any service, capability, functionality, or application provided using Internet protocol, or any successor protocol, that enables an end user to send or receive a communication in Internet protocol format, or any successor format, regardless of whether the communications is voice, data or video.

Nothing contained in this paragraph shall apply to retail services that are tariffed by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 41; Laws, 1993, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 513, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2018, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 2018).

§ 77-3-5.
Jurisdiction and powers of commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and subject only to the limitations imposed in this chapter and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the Public Service Commission shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over the intrastate business and property of public utilities and, for purposes of clarification of the existing scope of said exclusive original jurisdiction, such exclusive original jurisdiction extends, but is not limited to: the establishment of retail rates; challenges, including customer complaints, to the amount of a retail rate or customer bill or whether such rate is just and reasonable; and challenges to the validity or accuracy of rates charged by a public utility, or to the accuracy or reliability of information submitted to the Public Service Commission by a public utility or other person in support of or in opposition to a proposed or approved rate, regardless of the legal theory upon which any such challenge is made. However, the commission shall not have jurisdiction over the production and gathering of natural gas or the sale of natural gas in or within the vicinity of the field where produced, or over the facilities and equipment utilized in any such operations, including, but not limited to, such facilities as separators, scrubbers and gasoline plants of all types. Further, the commission shall not have jurisdiction over the governance, management or other internal affairs of entities as described by paragraphs (b) and (c) below. Moreover, the commission shall not have jurisdiction to regulate the rates for the sales and/or distribution:

Of gas, water, electricity or sewage disposal services by municipalities to such persons as said municipalities are authorized by law to serve;

Of gas or electricity by cooperative gas or electric power associations to the members thereof as consumers, except as provided by Section 77-3-17, where service is rendered in a municipality;

Of water or sewage disposal service by nonprofit corporations or associations where the governing body of such corporation or association is elected by the consumers thereof or appointed by the county board of supervisors; or

Of water by districts organized under the provisions of Chapter 45, Laws of 1966-1967, Extraordinary Session.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 503, § 1; ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 321, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2013); Laws, 2018, ch. 402, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 77-3-6.
Investigations and arbitration of billing and services between public utilities and customers.

Any dispute between a municipally-owned or operated public utility and a customer of such public utility with regard to billing and/or services in excess of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($ 2,500.00) shall be subject to investigation, review and arbitration by the commission upon petition filed therefor with the commission by such public utility or customer. However, the commission shall not commence any investigation or proceedings pursuant to such petition if at the time of filing the petition suit has been filed in any court of this state or of the United States with regard to the subject matter of the dispute and in which such public utility and customer are parties. Any such petition shall be immediately dismissed if any such suit is filed after filing of the petition with the commission.

In any arbitration proceedings commenced under the provisions of this section, the commission may, by order entered on its minutes and delivery of a certified copy thereof to the public utility, direct any municipally-owned or operated public utility to provide the commission with copies of all statements, accounts and reports concerning operation of the public utility which the utility is required to provide the governing authorities of the municipality under Section 21-27-17. The commission is further authorized to conduct and shall conduct investigation of and informal hearings in the dispute and may negotiate with the public utility and the customer for the resolution thereof. In every arbitration proceeding under this section the commission shall perform such duties as it deems reasonable and likely to result in settlement of the dispute without commencement of litigation between the public utility and the customer.

Participation in any investigation, proceeding, negotiation, or settlement under the provisions of this section shall be voluntary by the public utility and the customer; however, no suit may be commenced in any court of this state by either the public utility or customer based upon the facts giving rise to the dispute for a period of sixty (60) days after a petition is filed with the commission under this section.

The provisions prescribed herein for the Public Service Commission to investigate, review and arbitrate disputes between a municipally-owned or operated public utility and a customer of such public utility shall not extend to tort actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 77-3-7.
Bonding of commission employees; preference for full-time employees; additional personnel.

The commission may require such bonds to be carried on its employees as the commission may deem necessary, the cost thereof to be paid by the commission. Insofar as possible to do so, personnel of the commission shall be retained on a full-time basis and shall have no other employment of any kind. As to any part-time or specially employed person, the minutes of the commission shall recite the necessity for deviation from full-time employment.

Nothing in this section should be interpreted to prevent the commission from utilizing the services of these additional personnel herein provided in rendering assistance to the commission in its other duties where such assignment does not interfere with duties in administering the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 5; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 77-3-8.
Public service commission staff; Personnel Board to establish salaries; duties of staff; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

There is established in the commission a Public Service Commission staff, which staff shall be a unit, remain as a unit therein, and be responsive to the commission. The Public Service Commission staff shall consist of a sufficient number of professional, administrative, technical, clerical and other personnel as may be necessary for the staff to perform its duties and responsibilities as hereinafter provided. All such personnel of the Public Service Commission staff shall be recommended by the executive secretary and hired or rejected by the commission. Personnel shall be dismissed only for cause in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. The personnel of the Public Service Commission staff shall be compensated and reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including food, lodging and travel, by the commission from the Public Service Commission Regulation Fund established by Section 77-1-6, and as authorized by Section 25-3-41. The Public Service Commission staff shall be responsible for gathering and analyzing information relating to all matters within the authority of the commission.

The State Personnel Board shall establish and maintain entry-level salaries sufficiently competitive to attract competent, qualified applicants for the specialized skills and positions required by this section without regard to the salaries paid the commissioners and notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary. The State Personnel Board shall authorize, where necessary, a range of salaries within which salary negotiations may be conducted for those positions for which specific knowledge, skills and abilities are set forth herein.

The Public Service Commission staff shall perform such duties as are assigned to them by the commission.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 5; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 35; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-3-9.
Attorney for public service commission.

The Public Service Commission shall appoint an attorney who shall assist and advise the commission in all matters affecting its powers and duties and to perform such duties and services in connection with this chapter and the enforcement thereof as the commission may require. Such attorney shall be a member of the Mississippi State Bar, shall have practiced law for a minimum of five (5) years and shall possess considerable knowledge of utility regulation generally and of the case law, statutory law and the common law relating thereto. The attorney for the commission shall, upon request of the commission, aid in any investigation or hearing held under the provisions of this chapter. His salary shall be set by the commission, and his salary and expenses shall be paid in the same manner and from the same funds as the salary and expenses of the commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-03; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 7; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 77-3-10.
Regulated utilities to file with commission copies of contracts with affiliates; authority of commission to disallow certain payments as operating costs.

All public utilities, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, shall file with the commission copies of contracts, wherein the consideration therefor is One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) or more, with any holding, managing, operating, constructing, engineering or purchasing company, which is an affiliate of or a subsidiary of, such public utility, and when requested by the commission, copies of such contracts wherein the consideration therefor is less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) and copies of contracts with any person selling service of any kind. The commission may, after hearing on reasonable notice, disallow any payment to be capitalized or included as an operating cost of the public utility in the fixing of rates or as an asset in fixing a rate base under any such contract if it is found by the commission to be unjust or unreasonable, or made for the purpose or with the effect of concealing, unreasonably transferring or unreasonably dissipating the earnings of the public utility. Provided, however, that in the case of a public utility with fewer than twenty-five thousand (25,000) customers, this subsection shall apply only to such contracts as the commission shall request such public utility to file.

No public utility as described in subsection (1) of this section shall pay any fees, commission or compensation of any description whatsoever to any affiliated or subsidiary holding, managing, operating, constructing, engineering or purchasing company for services rendered or to be rendered without first filing copies of all agreements and contracts therefor with the commission. The commission may, after hearing on reasonable notice, disallow any such payment to be capitalized or included as an operating cost of the public utility in the fixing of rates or as an asset in fixing a rate base under such agreement or contract if it is found by the commission to be unjust or unreasonable. Provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to motor carriers of passengers.

The public service commission staff, upon direction of the commission, shall have full power and authority to investigate any such contract, arrangement, purchase or sale, and no payment disallowed by the commission shall be capitalized or included as an operating cost of the public utility in the fixing of rates or as an asset in fixing a rate base. If, in any such investigation, the public utility or affiliate shall unreasonably refuse to comply with any request of the commission for information with respect to relevant accounts and records, whether of such public utility or any affiliate, any portion of which may be applicable to any transaction under investigation, so that such parts thereof as the commission may deem material may be made part of the record, such refusal shall justify the commission in disapproving the transaction under investigation and disallowing payments in pursuance thereof, to be capitalized or included as an operating cost of the public utility in the fixing of rates or as an asset in fixing a rate base.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 77-3-11.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity required; exceptions; complaints prompting hearing as to adequacy of service.

No person shall construct, acquire, extend or operate equipment for manufacture, mixing, generating, transmitting or distributing natural or manufactured gas, or mixed gas, or water, for any intrastate sale to or for the public for compensation, or for the operation of a public utility operating a business and equipment or facilities as contemplated by subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3, without first having obtained from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require the operation of such equipment or facility.

No person shall construct, acquire, extend or operate equipment for manufacture, generating, transmitting or distributing electricity for any intrastate or interstate sale to or for the public for compensation without first having obtained from the commission a certificate that the present and future public convenience and necessity require or will require the operation of such equipment or facility. Provided, however, nothing herein contained shall be construed to require a joint municipal electric power agency organized in accordance with the provisions of Section 77-5-201 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, to obtain any permit, license, certificate or approval from the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

No person shall construct, acquire, extend or operate equipment or facilities for collecting, transmitting, treating or disposing of sewage, or otherwise operating an intrastate sewage disposal service, to or for the public for compensation, without first having obtained from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require the operation of such equipment or facilities.

However, nothing herein shall be construed to require any certificate of convenience and necessity from the commission for the production and gathering of natural gas, the sale of natural gas in or within the vicinity of the field where produced, the distribution or sale of liquefied petroleum gas, the sale of natural gas to the ultimate consumer for use as a motor vehicle fuel, or for the facilities and equipment utilized in any such operations.

Upon complaints filed by not less than ten percent (10%) of the total subscribers or three thousand five hundred (3,500) subscribers of a public utility, whichever is less, then the commission shall hold a hearing on the adequacy of service as contemplated in Section 77-3-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7716-05, 7716-45; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5; Laws, 1968, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 446; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 38; Laws, 1993, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 77-3-12.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity grants exclusive right to public utility to provide services for which certificate issued; utility systems authorized to extend facilities through certificated area of another utility for purposes other than certificated need.

A certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Public Service Commission authorizing public utility services to or for the public for compensation in an area grants an exclusive right to the public utility to provide that service in the certificated area.

Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section or any other provision of law shall prohibit any utility system from extending its system plant, lines or other facilities in or through the certificated area of another utility for purposes other than providing services to or for the public for compensation in such certificated area similar to those services provided by the certificated utility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002).